csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_CNJ_TI2.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiiwaanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiiwanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiiwaangen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiiwangen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiiwegwen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiigwen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiiwaagwen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiinigwen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiiwiingen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoowaanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoowanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoowaangen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoowangen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoowegwen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoogwen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoowaagwen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoonigwen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoowiingen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiiwaambaanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiiwambanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiiwaangibanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiiwangibanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: [wanitoosiiwegibanen,wanitoosiiwegobanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiigobanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiiwaagobanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiinigobanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+X+0SgO/0PlO: wantioosiiwiingibanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoowaambaanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoowambanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoowaangibanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoowangibanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: [wanitoowegibanen,wanitoowegobanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoogobanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoowaagobanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoonigobanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+X+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoowiingibanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiwaan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiwan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiwaang
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiwang
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiweg
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosig
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosigwaa
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosinig
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosing
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: wanitooyaan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: wanitooyan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: wanitooyaang
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: wanitooyang
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: wanitooyeg
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: wanitood
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoowaad
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoonid
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoong
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiwaambaan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiwamban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiwaangiban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiwangiban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: [wanitoosiwegiban,wanitoosiwegoban]
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosigoban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosigwaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosinigoban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosingiban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: wanitooyaambaan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: wanitooyamban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: wanitooyaangiban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: wanitooyangiban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: [wanitooyegiban,wanitooyegoban]
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoopan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoowaapan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoonipan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoongiban
